Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EDGERTON PUBLIC SCHOOL DISTRICT; REFUNDABLE SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of the following projects in the elementary and high schools in Independent School District No. 581, Edgerton, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after December 31, 2023, and before January 1, 2026: new text end new text begin (1) new 3's and 4's preschool classrooms; new text end new text begin (2) a new elementary music classroom; new text end new text begin (3) a new band room; new text end new text begin (4) administrative office relocation and addition with a secure entrance; new text end new text begin (5) a new gymnasium with improved community access; new text end new text begin (6) new locker rooms to include a storm shelter; new text end new text begin (7) updated and increased new parking with site drainage; new text end new text begin (8) modifications to current band room to allow for increased office space; and new text end new text begin (9) modifications to current office space. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2023, and before January 1, 2026. new text end